Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
Publisher's Notes.

This Constitution was ratified by the people October 13, 1874, and its adoption was proclaimed October 30, 1874. See Proclamation by state board of election supervisors, following Schedule to Constitution.

A constitutional convention was held in accordance with Acts 1977 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, as amended by Acts 1979, No. 622, and a new constitution was proposed. The proposed constitution was defeated at the general election held November 4, 1980. Returns: For 276,257; Against 464,210.

PREAMBLE

We, the People of the State of Arkansas, grateful to Almighty God for the privilege of choosing our own form of government; for our civil and religious liberty; and desiring to perpetuate its blessings, and secure the same to our selves and posterity; do ordain and establish this Constitution.